Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1720
Reserves, defined.

Reserves shall mean an allocation of retained income and shall include regular and special reserves, except for any allowance for loan or investment losses.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 20.